District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-329

Financial statement; report of activities and business; recommendations.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 7, 1957, 71 Stat. 622, Pub. L. 85-300, § 10
July 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 423, Pub. L. 85-561, § 1(15)
Sept. 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 702, Pub. L. 86-378, § 1(8)
Nov. 15, 1977, 91 Stat. 1383, Pub. L. 95-185, § 3
Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-152, § 21(a)(4), 41 DCR 4636

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-329.
1973 Ed., § 2-1728.